Arkansas, session 2025, HB1771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-86-119 is amended to read as follows:
23-86-119. Disclosure to policyholders.
(a)(1) Upon request from a policyholder with more than twenty-five
(25) fifty (50) insured employees under a comprehensive group health
insurance policy, any an insurer issuing or delivering a group accident and
health insurance policies policy in this state shall provide to the
policyholder the following information for the most recent twelve-month
period or for the entire period of coverage, whichever is shorter:
(A)(i) A monthly premium, claims, and enrollment report.
(ii) A monthly premium, claims, and enrollment
report required under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall include
without limitation:
(1)(a) Claims incurred Medical claims on a
paid basis by month;
(b) Pharmacy claims on a paid basis by month;
(2)(c) Premiums paid by month; and
*ANS337*
04-07-2025 17:24:30 ANS337

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 HB1771
(3)(d) Number Total number of insureds to
include dependents enrolled members, including dependents by month; and
(4) Claims exceeding ten thousand dollars
($10,000) on any individual with diagnosis during the same period.
(B)(i) A high-cost claimant report that is applicable to
an enrolled member with claims exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(ii) A high-cost claimant report required under
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall include for each enrolled
member:
(a) Current coverage status, either active or
terminated;
(b) Total medical claims on a paid basis by
month; and
(c) Total pharmacy claims on a paid basis by
month.
(2) A report required under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) or
subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be provided to the
policyholder no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the request of
the policyholder.
(3) A policyholder may request reporting under this section no
more frequently than on a quarterly basis.
(b) This section does not require the insurer to disclose any
information that is required by law to be confidential.
(c) As used in this section, "enrolled member":
(1) Means an insured employee under a comprehensive group health
insurance policy; and
(2) Includes a subscriber or a certificate holder.
(d) In conformity with the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, this section does not
require an insurer or health maintenance organization to disclose any claims
information or data that reasonably, or by reasonable inference, may reveal
the identity of an enrolled member under the standards of the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191.

/s/Perry

04-07-2025 17:24:30 ANS337